Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.480

Industrial insurance.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, members shall be eligible for industrial insurance as provided by Title 51 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, and shall be included in the payroll of the employer for such purpose.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 9.]

NOTES:

Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 294: See notes following RCW 41.26.410.